District of Columbia statutes.
3-2921

Repealed

Licensees in medicine, surgery, or midwifery under prior law to be relicensed; osteopaths, chiropractors, and those who practice the healing art to apply for license; license without examination to those engaged in practice of drugless method of healing

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1104(e), 33 DCR 729
1981 Ed., §§ 2-1301 to 2-1343.